Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-211
Certificates of registration; kinds; issuance; when authorized.

Whenever the provisions of the Barber Act have been complied with, the Board of Barber Examiners shall issue a certificate of registration as a registered barber instructor or registered barber, or a certificate of approval of a barber school.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 9, p. 430;

C.S.1929, § 71-2011;

R.S.1943, § 71-211;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 16, p. 1321;

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 21.